Tennessee, session 114, HB0331.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 13-23-121(a), is amended by
deleting the language "four billion dollars ($4,000,000,000)," and substituting instead "six billion
dollars ($6,000,000,000),".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0331
001248
- 1 -